Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.465

Audits—Law enforcement agency training and certification requirements.

Upon the request of the commission, the office of the Washington state auditor is authorized to conduct an audit procedure on any law enforcement agency to ensure the agency is in compliance with all laws, policies, and procedures governing the training and certification of peace officers employed by the agency. A copy of any completed audit must be sent to the commission, law enforcement agency, city or county council, county prosecutor, and relevant committees of the legislature.

[ 2021 c 319 s 2.]